Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3579
Act, how cited.

Sections 23-3579 to 23-35,120 shall be known and may be cited as the Hospital Authorities Act.

Laws 1971, LB 54, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.74;

Laws 1993, LB 815, § 1.